Nevada, session 83, SB272-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 332 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before September 1 of each year, each local
government shall post in a clear and conspicuous place on the
Internet website maintained by the local government:
(a) The total number of contracts and performance contracts
awarded by the local government pursuant to this chapter during
the immediately preceding fiscal year;
(b) The total dollar amount of all contracts and performance
contracts awarded by the local government pursuant to this
chapter during the immediately preceding fiscal year;
(c) The total number of contracts and performance contracts
awarded by the local government pursuant to this chapter during
the immediately preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses; and
(d) The total dollar amount of all contracts and performance
contracts awarded by the local government pursuant to this
chapter during the immediately preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “LGBTQ” means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer or intersex or of any other nonheterosexual or noncisgender
orientation or gender identity or expression.
(b) “LGBTQ-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who identifies as LGBTQ;
or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who identify as LGBTQ.
(c) “Minority group” means:
(1) A racial or ethnic minority group; or
(2) A group of persons with disabilities.
(d) “Minority-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a member of a
minority group; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who is a member of a minority group.
-
*SB272_R1*

– 3 –
(e) “Veteran-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a veteran; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more veterans.
Sec. 2. Chapter 333 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before September 1 of each year, each using agency
shall post in a clear and conspicuous place on the Internet website
maintained by the using agency:
(a) The total number of contracts awarded by the using agency
pursuant to this chapter during the immediately preceding fiscal
year;
(b) The total dollar amount of all contracts awarded by the
using agency pursuant to this chapter during the immediately
preceding fiscal year;
(c) The total number of contracts awarded by the using agency
pursuant to this chapter during the immediately preceding fiscal
year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses; and
(d) The total dollar amount of all contracts awarded by the
using agency pursuant to this chapter during the immediately
preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “LGBTQ” means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer or intersex or of any other nonheterosexual or noncisgender
orientation or gender identity or expression.
(b) “LGBTQ-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who identifies as LGBTQ;
or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who identify as LGBTQ.
(c) “Minority group” means:
(1) A racial or ethnic minority group; or
(2) A group of persons with disabilities.
(d) “Minority-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a member of a
minority group; or
-
*SB272_R1*

– 4 –
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who is a member of a minority group.
(e) “Veteran-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a veteran; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more veterans.
Sec. 3. Chapter 333A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before September 1 of each year, each using agency
shall post in a clear and conspicuous place on the Internet website
maintained by the using agency:
(a) The total number of performance contracts awarded by the
using agency pursuant to this chapter during the immediately
preceding fiscal year;
(b) The total dollar amount of all performance contracts
awarded by the using agency pursuant to this chapter during the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(c) The total number of performance contracts awarded by the
using agency pursuant to this chapter during the immediately
preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses; and
(d) The total dollar amount of all performance contracts
awarded by the using agency pursuant to this chapter during the
immediately preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “LGBTQ” means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer or intersex or of any other nonheterosexual or noncisgender
orientation or gender identity or expression.
(b) “LGBTQ-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who identifies as LGBTQ;
or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who identify as LGBTQ.
(c) “Minority group” means:
(1) A racial or ethnic minority group; or
(2) A group of persons with disabilities.
(d) “Minority-owned business” means a business that:
-
*SB272_R1*

– 5 –
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a member of a
minority group; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who is a member of a minority group.
(e) “Veteran-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a veteran; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more veterans.
Sec. 4. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before September 1 of each year, each public body
shall post in a clear and conspicuous place on the Internet website
maintained by the public body:
(a) The total number of contracts for public works awarded by
the public body pursuant to this chapter during the immediately
preceding fiscal year;
(b) The total dollar amount of all contracts for public works
awarded by the public body pursuant to this chapter during the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(c) The total number of contracts for public works awarded by
the public body pursuant to this chapter during the immediately
preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses; and
(d) The total dollar amount of all contracts for public works
awarded by the public body pursuant to this chapter during the
immediately preceding fiscal year to:
(1) Minority-owned businesses;
(2) Women-owned businesses;
(3) LGBTQ-owned businesses; or
(4) Veteran-owned businesses.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “LGBTQ” means lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,
queer or intersex or of any other nonheterosexual or noncisgender
orientation or gender identity or expression.
(b) “LGBTQ-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who identifies as LGBTQ;
or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who identify as LGBTQ.
(c) “Minority group” means:
(1) A racial or ethnic minority group; or
(2) A group of persons with disabilities.
-
*SB272_R1*

– 6 –
(d) “Minority-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a member of a
minority group; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more natural persons who is a member of a minority group.
(e) “Veteran-owned business” means a business that:
(1) Is owned by a natural person who is a veteran; or
(2) Has at least 51 percent of its ownership interest held by
one or more veterans.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2024.
H
-
*SB272_R1*